Tennessee, session 114, SB2656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 10, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall conduct a study on homelessness in this state and ways to combat the rise of
homelessness. On or before January 31, 2027, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the committee of
the house of representatives having jurisdiction over matters pertaining to
homelessness, the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate, and the
legislative librarian. It is the legislative intent that this study must be conducted from
TACIR's existing resources.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2656
012778
- 1 -